District of Columbia statutes.
47-344

Repealed

Ranking of depositories; qualifying loans; information required to bid.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 5, 24 DCR 3725
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-40, § 2(b), 28 DCR 3395
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-187, § 4, 35 DCR 8648
Apr. 8, 1992, D.C. Law 9-91, § 2(b), 39 DCR 1365
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56,§ 2(a), 44 DCR 6933

Repeal of Law 9-11

Section 3 of D.C. Law 9-91 repealed the District of Columbia Depository Act of 1977 Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-11).

Inseverability of Law 9-91: Section 4 of D.C. Law 9-91 provided that if any provision of § 47-343(f) or § 47-344(f), as added by § 2 of the act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, beyond the statutory authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, or otherwise invalid, then all provisions of §§ 47-343(e)-(f) and 47-344(e)-(f), as added by § 2 of the act, shall be deemed invalid.
1973 Ed., § 47-274.
1981 Ed., § 47-344.